Nebraska, session 109, LB567.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB567 LB567
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) On or before December 1, 2025, the State Board of
Education may develop and adopt a model policy for use in school
districts relating to community engagement to increase engagement between
schools, students and their families, and surrounding communities. Such
policy shall include:
(a) Integrated student supports representing a school-based approach
to promoting students' well-being by providing and coordinating services
for students and families that target academic and nonacademic barriers
to educational and life success;
(b) Extended learning time and opportunities before and after the
typical school day, and over summer vacation and other breaks, and
augment the learning opportunities offered during the traditional school
day and year;
(c) Collaborative leadership practices that engage stakeholders with
different types of experience and expertise, including parents, students,
teachers, principals, and community partners in working together and
sharing decisions and responsibilities toward a commonly held vision or
outcome for the school; and
(d) Authentic family engagement that encompasses a broad array of
interactions among parents, students, educators, and community members
that fall along a spectrum in which families and community members
exercise varying degrees of power within schools.
(2) A school district may adopt a policy relating to engagement
between schools, students and their families, and surrounding
communities. Such policy shall be consistent with the model policy
described in subsection (1) of this section if developed by the State
Board of Education.
-2-